src/fst/morphology/orig/srcV2/esu.twol.permissive.xfst
define Uppercase "$" "a"   -> "A",
                 "$" "b"   -> "B",
                 "$" "c"   -> "C",
                 "$" "d"   -> "D",
                 "$" "e"   -> "E",
                 "$" "f"   -> "F",
                 "$" "g"   -> "G",
                 "$" "h"   -> "H",
                 "$" "i"   -> "I",
                 "$" "j"   -> "J",
                 "$" "k"   -> "K",
                 "$" "l"   -> "L",
                 "$" "m"   -> "M",
                 "$" "n"   -> "N",
                 "$" "o"   -> "O",
                 "$" "p"   -> "P",
                 "$" "q"   -> "Q",
                 "$" "r"   -> "R",
                 "$" "s"   -> "S",
                 "$" "t"   -> "T",
                 "$" "u"   -> "U",
                 "$" "v"   -> "V",
                 "$" "w"   -> "W",
                 "$" "x"   -> "X",
                 "$" "y"   -> "Y",
                 "$" "z"   -> "Z",
                 "$" "m̄"   -> "M̄",
                 "$" "n̄"   -> "N̄",
                 "$" "vv"  -> "Vv",
                 "$" "ll"  -> "Ll",
                 "$" "ss"  -> "Ss",
                 "$" "gg"  -> "Gg",
                 "$" "rr"  -> "Rr",
                 "$" "ng"  -> "Ng",
                 "$" "n͞g"  -> "N͞g",
                 "$" "u͡g"  -> "U͡g",
                 "$" "u͡r"  -> "U͡r",
                 "$" "u͡gg" -> "U͡gg",
                 "$" "u͡rr" -> "U͡rr";

define rmUppercase "$" -> 0 ;                     

define NonYupik   "1" -> "a",
                  "2" -> "b",
                  "3" -> "c",
                  "4" -> "d",
                  "5" -> "e",
                  "6" -> "f",
                  "7" -> "g",
                  "8" -> "h",
                  "9" -> "i",
                  "10" -> "j",
                  "11" -> "k",
                  "12" -> "l",
                  "13" -> "m",
                  "14" -> "n",
                  "15" -> "o",
                  "16" -> "p",
                  "17" -> "q",
                  "18" -> "r",
                  "19" -> "s",
                  "20" -> "t",
                  "21" -> "u",
                  "22" -> "v",
                  "23" -> "w",
                  "24" -> "x",
                  "25" -> "y",
                  "26" -> "z",
                  "27" -> "vv",
                  "28" -> "ll",
                  "29" -> "ss",
                  "30" -> "gg",
                  "31" -> "rr",
                  "32" -> "ng",
                  "33" -> "n͞g",
                  "34" -> "u͡g",
                  "35" -> "u͡gg",
                  "36" -> "u͡r",
                  "37" -> "u͡rr",
                  "38" -> "m̄",
                  "39" -> "n̄";  

regex AutomaticDevoicing   .o.
      WeakInitialE         .o.
      urDeletion           .o. 
      DropHattedE          .o.
      TripleConsonant      .o.
      TripleVowel          .o.
      ConnectiveMood       .o.
      WordAdjustments      .o.
      arDeletion           .o.
      RemoveApostrophe     .o.
      AddApostrophe        .o.
      AutomaticDevoicing   .o.
      ToOrthography        .o.
      RemoveLigature       .o.
      FinalWordApostrophe  .o.
      Lowercase            .o.
      rmUppercase          .o.
      NonYupik              ;
!      Uppercase             ;
